Utah statutes.
77-32-602.   County participation.

(1) (a)  Any county may participate in the fund subject to the provisions of this chapter.  Any county that chooses not to participate, or is not current in its contributions, is ineligible to receive money from the fund.

(b)  The board may revoke a county's participation in the fund if the county fails to pay its assessments when due.

(2)  To participate in the fund, the legislative body of a county shall:

(a)  adopt a resolution approving participation in the fund and committing that county to fulfill the assessment requirements as set forth in Subsection (3) and Section 77-32-603; and

(b)  submit a certified copy of that resolution together with an application to the board.

(3)  By January 15 of each year, a participating county shall contribute to the fund an amount computed in accordance with Section 77-32-603.

(4)  Any participating county may withdraw from participation in the fund upon:

(a)  adoption by its legislative body of a resolution to withdraw; and

(b)  notice to the board by January 1 of the year prior to withdrawal.

(5)  A county withdrawing from participation in the fund, or whose participation in the fund has been revoked for failure to pay its assessments when due, shall forfeit the right to:

(a)  any previously payed assessment;

(b)  relief from its obligation to pay its assessment during the period of its participation in the fund; and

(c)  any benefit from the fund, including reimbursement of costs which accrued after the last day of the period for which the county has paid its assessment.



Amended by Chapter 333, 1998 General Session

